Ohio, session 136, HB964.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2313.06 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2313.06. (A) The commissioners of jurors shall compile a new and complete jury source list annually in accordance with both of the following: (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, on a date ordered by the court of common pleas, the board of elections for each county shall compile and file with the commissioners of jurors of the county a certified, current list containing the names, addresses, and dates of birth of all the electors of the county shown on the registration lists for the most recent general election. The board of elections shall remove from the list of all electors those electors who have failed to vote at least once during the preceding four consecutive years. The voter list so compiled shall be the current voter list. (b) The current voter list shall not include any elector who has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2)(b) of this section, on a date ordered by the court of common pleas of any particular county, the registrar of motor vehicles shall compile and file with the commissioners of jurors of each county a certified, current list containing the names, addresses, dates of birth, and citizenship of all residents of the particular county who have been issued, on or after January 1, 1984, a commercial driver's license pursuant to Chapter 4506. or a driver's license or identification card pursuant to Chapter 4507. of the Revised Code that is valid and current on the date of the compilation of the list, who are or will be eighteen years of age or older as of the day of the general election of the year in which the list is filed, and who, regardless of whether they actually are registered to vote, would be electors if they were registered to vote. (b) The list compiled under division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall not include any person who has provided to the registrar of motor vehicles an address designated by the secretary of state to use as the person's address because the person is a program participant in the address confidentiality program described in sections 111.41 to 111.99 of the Revised Code. (B) In compiling the annual jury source list, the commissioners, unless otherwise ordered by the court of common pleas, shall include all names from the current voter list and may include all names for from the certified, current list of all names provided to the commissioners from by the registrar of motor vehicles; provided that, upon merging the lists, any duplication shall be eliminated. The commissioners shall exclude from the annual jury source list the names of any jurors permanently excused under section 2313.14 of the Revised Code and the names of any jurors discharged under section 2313.21 of the Revised Code. (C) The annual jury source list so compiled shall be certified by the commissioners and filed in their office before the beginning of each jury year. The names shall be entered in a suitable book or record, to be known as the "annual jury source list," and shall be arranged alphabetically. With each name shall be recorded the place of residence, date of birth, and citizenship of the person as nearly as they can be ascertained. A duplicate of the list shall be certified by the commissioners and filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas. (D)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) of this section, the commissioners may, by order of the court, supplement the annual jury source list with the names of persons who, after the list has been filed, are discovered to be qualified to serve as jurors. The commissioners shall certify any supplemental jury source list and file it in their office and in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas. Any supplemental jury source list shall be added to the annual jury source list, and the supplemented annual jury source list shall be used for the rest of the jury year. (2) A supplemental jury source list shall not include any person who appears to the commissioners to be a program participant in the address confidentiality program described in sections 111.41 to 111.99 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing section 2313.06 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.